Vermont, session 2025-2026, S144.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 9 is added to read:
§ 9. SECONDARY ENFORCEMENT OF VIOLATIONS
(a) The following offenses may be enforced only if a law enforcement
officer has detained the operator of a motor vehicle for another suspected
violation:
(1) section 307 of this title (failure to carry a registration certificate);
VT LEG #380634 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.144
2025 Page 2 of 5
(2) subsection 511(c) of this title (failure to display registration sticker
or failure to display unobstructed license numbers);
(3) section 512 of this title (failure to display number plate on trailer or
semi-trailer);
(4) subsections 601(a) and 676(a) of this title (operation by an individual
without a valid driver’s license under certain circumstances);
(5) section 615 of this title (operation by an individual with a learner’s
permit);
(6) subsection 1031(b) of this title (operation on the right side of the
highway);
(7) section 1110 of this title (prolonged idling);
(8) section 1125 of this title (operation with an obstructed windshield or
windows);
(9) subsection 1222(c) of this title (operation of an uninspected motor
vehicle);
(10) subsection 1248(a) of this title (taillights), but only if a single
taillight or the brake light portion of a single taillight is broken;
(11) section 1064 of this title (signaling a lane change or turn);
(12) section 1082 of this title (impeding traffic with a slow moving
vehicle); and
VT LEG #380634 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.144
2025 Page 3 of 5
(13) section 1221 of this title (operating a vehicle with an excessively
loud muffler).
(b) An operator shall not be subject to the penalty established for the
violations listed in subsection (a) of this section unless the operator is required
to pay a penalty for a primary violation.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(8) of this section, a law enforcement
officer may stop a vehicle for a violation of the provisions of section 1125 of
this title (operation with an obstructed windshield or windows) if the officer
reasonably believes based on articulable facts that the violation is of a nature or
magnitude that poses an immediate threat to the health or safety of the vehicle
operator or passengers or others on the highway.
(2) Prior to stopping a vehicle pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, a law enforcement officer shall either log digitally or notify
dispatch of the reason for the stop, including a detailed description of the
immediate threat to the health or safety of the vehicle operator or passengers or
others on the highway.
(d) A law enforcement officer shall not stop or otherwise detain an operator
of a motor vehicle to enforce any warrant for a misdemeanor unless the
warrant is for:
(1) a violation of section 1201 of this title (operating under the influence
of alcohol or another substance);
VT LEG #380634 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.144
2025 Page 4 of 5
(2) a violation of 13 V.S.A. § 1030 (violation of an abuse prevention
order, an order against stalking or sexual assault, or a protective order
concerning contact with a child); or
(3) a violation of 13 V.S.A. § 1042 (domestic assault).
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 10 is added to read:
§ 10. LAW ENFORCEMENT SEARCHES FOLLOWING STOP FOR
TRAFFIC VIOLATION; RESTRICTIONS
(a) Following a motor vehicle stop, a law enforcement officer shall not:
(1) request consent to search the operator of the motor vehicle, any
passenger in the motor vehicle, or the motor vehicle; or
(2) except as provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
question the operator of the motor vehicle or any passenger in the motor
vehicle about any subject other than the moving violation that was the reason
for the stop.
(b) A law enforcement officer may question a motor vehicle operator or a
passenger in a motor vehicle that has been stopped for a moving violation
regarding a subject other than the moving violation if the law enforcement
officer detects evidence that establishes a reasonable suspicion sufficient to
question the operator regarding an independent criminal offense.
VT LEG #380634 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.144
2025 Page 5 of 5
(c) Evidence recovered during a stop, detention, or search that is in
violation of this section or section 9 of this chapter shall be inadmissible in any
criminal proceeding.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380634 v.2